North Carolina, session 2025, SB540.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-472.23(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-472.23. Small county school system supplemental funding.
(a) Allotment Schedule. – Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section,
each eligible county school administrative unit shall receive a dollar allotment according to the
following schedule, on the basis of allotted ADM for the county school administrative unit, to
the extent funds are made available for this purpose:
Allotted ADM Small County Allotment
0-1,300 $1,820,000$2,548,000
1,301-1,700 $1,774,700$2,484,580
1,701-2,000 $1,729,400$2,421,160
2,001-2,300 $1,684,100$2,357,740
2,301-2,600 $1,638,800$2,294,320
2,601-2,800 $1,593,500$2,230,900
2,801-3,300 $1,548,200$2,167,480"
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of twenty million nine hundred sixty-one thousand one hundred eighty
dollars ($20,961,180) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to implement the
provisions of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S540-v-1*